Washington statutes.
RCW 43.220.905

Intent—Application—2011 c 20.

It is the intent of this act to centralize the administration of the Washington conservation corps, which was previously administered by the departments of ecology, natural resources, and fish and wildlife and the state parks and recreation commission, into the department of ecology. This act is prospective only, and any grant awards or conservation corps crew or individual placements finalized by other agencies or partners prior to July 22, 2011, remain unaffected by this act.

[ 2011 c 20 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 20: See note following RCW 43.220.020.